Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-723
Contamination; point source; Director of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties.

If the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment determines from the study conducted pursuant to section 46-722 that one or more sources of contamination are point sources, he or she shall expeditiously use the procedures authorized in the Environmental Protection Act to stabilize or reduce the level and prevent the increase or spread of such contamination.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.05;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 43;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.37;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 63;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 32;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 222.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.